Utah statutes.
53A-1-604.   Test development, publication, and administration.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall develop, publish, and administer criterion-referenced tests and a tenth grade basic skills competency test.

(2)  The board may use the expert services of any person in the public or private sector in:

(a)  evaluating current tests and assessment programs; or

(b)  developing, publishing, and administering new tests.

